Utah statutes.
62A-7-109.5.   Restitution by youth offender.
(1)  The division shall make reasonable efforts to ensure that restitution is
made to the victim of a youth offender.  Restitution shall be made through the
employment of youth offenders in work programs.  However, reimbursement to the
victim of a youth offender is conditional upon that youth offender's
involvement in the work program.
(2)  Restitution may be made a condition of release, placement, or parole by
the division.  In the event of parole revocation or, where there is no court
order requiring restitution to the victim and the loss to the victim has been
determined, the division shall evaluate whether restitution is appropriate
and, if so, the amount or type of restitution to which the victim is entitled.
(3)  The division shall notify the juvenile court of all restitution paid to
victims through the employment of youth offenders in work programs.
